Tennessee, session 114, HB2489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-203(a)(13), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(D)
(i) If a school board terminates its director of schools without cause, then
the school board may offer or provide severance pay to the terminated director of
schools; provided, that the amount of severance pay offered or provided must not
exceed the annual salary amount the director of schools was receiving at the
time of termination;
(ii) If a school board terminates its director of schools with cause, then
the school board shall not offer or provide severance pay to the terminated
director of schools;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after such date.
HB2489
000024
- 1 -